West Virginia, session 2025, SB106.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. Definitions. §15A-1-9a. Authorizing Department of Homeland Security to assist with border security in Texas.(a) Legislative findings. – The Legislature finds that the crisis at the southern border, particularly in the state of Texas, has lasting negative consequences for the state of Texas and the state of West Virginia. Since October 1, 2023, border authorities have encountered nearly one million illegal entries at the southern border. For this reason, the Secretary of the West Virginia Department of Homeland Security must be authorized to work directly with government officials in Texas to provide as much support as possible to secure the border.(b) (1) Enactment. – The West Virginia Secretary of Homeland Security shall be authorized to provide direct support to the state of Texas and the Texas Border Patrol including, but not limited to, costs for razor wire, sand, security cameras, concrete, rebar, and other materials related to securing the border.  (2) The monetary amount of aid to be provided shall not exceed $25,000.(3) The West Virginia Secretary of Homeland Security shall coordinate with government officials in the state of Texas, including but not limited to the Governor's office, the Texas Border Patrol, and the Border Programs Teams within the Texas Office of Public Safety, to ensure the most beneficial placement of such support.